District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.14

Applicability of provisions to existing companies.

No company shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter by reason of its having been incorporated in the District or elsewhere prior to the effective date of this chapter, except that, in the case of companies authorized in the District on October 9, 1940, and continuously thereafter without any increase of authority, the minimum capital and surplus required of a stock company, and the minimum surplus required of a mutual or reciprocal company, or of a Lloyd’s organization, by the laws of the District heretofore applicable shall not be increased by this chapter, and provided also that in the case of such continuously authorized companies the provisions of § 31-2502.24 relating to the names of companies, and the provisions of § 31-2502.25 relating to the amount of surplus necessary to the issuance of policies having no provision for contingent liability, shall not be applicable.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1070, ch. 792, ch. II, § 14
Aug. 14, 1973, 87 Stat. 304, Pub. L. 93-89, title IV, § 401
Feb. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-52, § 4, 27 DCR 26
This section is referenced in § 31-2502.24 and § 31-2502.25.
1981 Ed., § 35-1517.
1973 Ed., § 35-1317.
“The effective date of this chapter,” referred to near the beginning of the section, means the effective date of the Act of October 9, 1940. Section 48 of such Act provided that the Act would become effective 30 days after October 9, 1940.